6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
SET UTF-8
WORDCHARS -’'1234567890.
TRY esntiarulodcpmévqfgbhàxèjyêMILzACçôîPâùJFSûBVœRDGNETHXkïOwKWYUëQÉZŒüãÎáöóÈíæÅñäśńÿ
MAP 25
MAP aàâäAÀÂÄ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP iîïyIÎÏY
MAP oôöOÔÖ
MAP uùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP cçCÇ
MAP bB
MAP dD
MAP fF
MAP gG
MAP hH
MAP jJ
MAP kK
MAP lL
MAP mM
MAP nN
MAP pP
MAP qQ
MAP rR
MAP sS
MAP tT
MAP vV
MAP wW
MAP xX
MAP zZ
REP 82
REP ^Ca$ Ça
REP ^l l'
REP ^d d'
REP ^n n'
REP ^s s'
REP ^j j'
REP ^m m'
REP ^t t'
REP ^c c'
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP c qu
REP qu c
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP x ct
REP ct x
REP bb b
REP b bb
REP cc c
REP c cc
REP ff f
REP f ff
REP ll l
REP l ll
REP mm m
REP m mm
REP nn n
REP n nn
REP pp p
REP p pp
REP rr r
REP r rr
REP ss s
REP s ss
REP ss c
REP c ss
REP ss ç
REP ç ss
REP tt t
REP t tt
REP œ oe
REP oe œ
REP æ ae
REP ae æ
REP ai é
REP é ai
REP ai è
REP è ai
REP ai ê
REP ê ai
REP ei é
REP é ei
REP ei è
REP è ei
REP ei ê
REP ê ei
REP o au
REP au o
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP ett èt
REP èt ett
REP ell èl
REP èl ell
REP t th
REP th t
REP ième$ e
REP ème$ e
REP è$ e
REP mn$ min
REP ogue$ ogiste
REP ogiste$ ogue
REP disez$ dites
REP fesez$ faites
REP faisez$ faites
REP puit puits
REP sanctionnable punissable
REP questionnable discutable
REP antitartre détartrant
REP email courriel
REP construirent construisirent
KEY azertyuiop|qsdfghjklmù|wxcvbn|aéz|yèu|iço|oàp|aqz|zse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpm|qws|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj
ICONV 42
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬅ ft
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV ﬆ st
ICONV ſ s
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç
OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’
FLAG long
FULLSTRIP
NEEDAFFIX ()
FORBIDDENWORD {}
CIRCUMFIX **
KEEPCASE ||
NOSUGGEST --
BREAK 7
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ^'
BREAK ^‘
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$
PFX L' Y 34
PFX L' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:le|la+
PFX L' a l'A a dp:le|la+
PFX L' à l'À à dp:le|la+
PFX L' â l'Â â dp:le|la+
PFX L' e l'E e dp:le|la+
PFX L' é l'É é dp:le|la+
PFX L' è l'È è dp:le|la+
PFX L' ê l'Ê ê dp:le|la+
PFX L' i l'I i dp:le|la+
PFX L' î l'Î î dp:le|la+
PFX L' o l'O o dp:le|la+
PFX L' ô l'Ô ô dp:le|la+
PFX L' u l'U u dp:le|la+
PFX L' y l'Y y dp:le|la+
PFX L' h l'H h dp:le|la+
PFX L' œ l'Œ œ dp:le|la+
PFX L' æ l'Æ æ dp:le|la+
PFX L' 0 L' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:le|la+
PFX L' a L'A a dp:le|la+
PFX L' à L'À à dp:le|la+
PFX L' â L'Â â dp:le|la+
PFX L' e L'E e dp:le|la+
PFX L' é L'É é dp:le|la+
PFX L' è L'È è dp:le|la+
PFX L' ê L'Ê ê dp:le|la+
PFX L' i L'I i dp:le|la+
PFX L' î L'Î î dp:le|la+
PFX L' o L'O o dp:le|la+
PFX L' ô L'Ô ô dp:le|la+
PFX L' u L'U u dp:le|la+
PFX L' y L'Y y dp:le|la+
PFX L' h L'H h dp:le|la+
PFX L' œ L'Œ œ dp:le|la+
PFX L' æ L'Æ æ dp:le|la+
PFX D' Y 34
PFX D' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:de+
PFX D' a d'A a dp:de+
PFX D' à d'À à dp:de+
PFX D' â d'Â â dp:de+
PFX D' e d'E e dp:de+
PFX D' é d'É é dp:de+
PFX D' è d'È è dp:de+
PFX D' ê d'Ê ê dp:de+
PFX D' i d'I i dp:de+
PFX D' î d'Î î dp:de+
PFX D' o d'O o dp:de+
PFX D' ô d'Ô ô dp:de+
PFX D' u d'U u dp:de+
PFX D' y d'Y y dp:de+
PFX D' h d'H h dp:de+
PFX D' œ d'Œ œ dp:de+
PFX D' æ d'Æ æ dp:de+
PFX D' 0 D' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:de+
PFX D' a D'A a dp:de+
PFX D' à D'À à dp:de+
PFX D' â D'Â â dp:de+
PFX D' e D'E e dp:de+
PFX D' é D'É é dp:de+
PFX D' è D'È è dp:de+
PFX D' ê D'Ê ê dp:de+
PFX D' i D'I i dp:de+
PFX D' î D'Î î dp:de+
PFX D' o D'O o dp:de+
PFX D' ô D'Ô ô dp:de+
PFX D' u D'U u dp:de+
PFX D' y D'Y y dp:de+
PFX D' h D'H h dp:de+
PFX D' œ D'Œ œ dp:de+
PFX D' æ D'Æ æ dp:de+
PFX Q' Y 34
PFX Q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:que+
PFX Q' a qu'A a dp:que+
PFX Q' à qu'À à dp:que+
PFX Q' â qu'Â â dp:que+
PFX Q' e qu'E e dp:que+
PFX Q' é qu'É é dp:que+
PFX Q' è qu'È è dp:que+
PFX Q' ê qu'Ê ê dp:que+
PFX Q' i qu'I i dp:que+
PFX Q' î qu'Î î dp:que+
PFX Q' o qu'O o dp:que+
PFX Q' ô qu'Ô ô dp:que+
PFX Q' u qu'U u dp:que+
PFX Q' y qu'Y y dp:que+
PFX Q' h qu'H h dp:que+
PFX Q' œ qu'Œ œ dp:que+
PFX Q' æ qu'Æ æ dp:que+
PFX Q' 0 Qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:que+
PFX Q' a Qu'A a dp:que+
PFX Q' à Qu'À à dp:que+
PFX Q' â Qu'Â â dp:que+
PFX Q' e Qu'E e dp:que+
PFX Q' é Qu'É é dp:que+
PFX Q' è Qu'È è dp:que+
PFX Q' ê Qu'Ê ê dp:que+
PFX Q' i Qu'I i dp:que+
PFX Q' î Qu'Î î dp:que+
PFX Q' o Qu'O o dp:que+
PFX Q' ô Qu'Ô ô dp:que+
PFX Q' u Qu'U u dp:que+
PFX Q' y Qu'Y y dp:que+
PFX Q' h Qu'H h dp:que+
PFX Q' œ Qu'Œ œ dp:que+
PFX Q' æ Qu'Æ æ dp:que+
PFX Q* Y 6
PFX Q* 0 quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:quoique+
PFX Q* 0 puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:puisque+
PFX Q* 0 lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:lorsque+
PFX Q* 0 Quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:quoique+
PFX Q* 0 Puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:puisque+
PFX Q* 0 Lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] dp:lorsque+
PFX Qj Y 1
PFX Qj 0 jusqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] dp:jusque+
PFX Si Y 1
PFX Si 0 s' . dp:si+
SFX S. Y 2
SFX S. 0 0 [^sxz] is:sg
SFX S. 0 s [^sxz] is:pl
SFX S= Y 1
SFX S= 0 s [^sxz]
SFX X. Y 4
SFX X. 0 0 [ul] is:sg
SFX X. 0 x [aeoœ]u is:pl
SFX X. l ux al is:pl
SFX X. il ux ail is:pl
SFX A. Y 11
SFX A. 0 0 [^sxz] is:sg
SFX A. 0 0 [sxz] is:inv
SFX A. 0 s [^sxz] is:pl
SFX A. an en an is:pl
SFX A. f ves f is:pl
SFX A. h hes h is:pl
SFX A. s ses s is:pl
SFX A. x xes x is:pl
SFX A. y ies y is:pl
SFX A. zz zzes zz is:pl
SFX A. z zzes [^z]z is:pl
SFX I. Y 9
SFX I. 0 0 [^sxz] is:sg
SFX I. 0 0 [sxz] is:inv
SFX I. 0 s [^sxz] is:pl
SFX I. a e a is:pl
SFX I. e i e is:pl
SFX I. en ina en is:pl
SFX I. o i o is:pl
SFX I. um a um is:pl
SFX I. us i us is:pl
