6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
Aalter/L'D'Q'
Abu/L'D'Q'
AbulÉdu/L'D'Q'
Adige/L'D'
Adina/L'D'Q'
Adrian/L'D'Q'
Agrippine/L'D'Q'
Agroqualita/L'D'Q'
Aignan/L'D'Q'
Akira/L'D'Q'
Aladin/L'D'Q'
Albas/L'D'Q'
Alcibiade/L'D'Q'
Alejandra/L'D'Q'
Alessia/L'D'Q'
Alexis/L'D'Q'
Algésiras/L'D'Q'
Alix/L'D'Q'
Ally/L'D'Q'
Alsace/L'D'
Amanda/L'D'Q'
Amazonie/L'D'
Amélia/L'D'Q'
Amphitrite/L'D'Q'
Anaëlle/L'D'Q'
Anaximandre/L'D'Q'
Android/D'Q'--
Andy/L'D'Q'
Angers/L'D'Q'
Anne/L'D'Q'
Anne-Marie/L'D'Q'
Annick/L'D'Q'
Antonin/L'D'Q'
Antony/L'D'Q'
Anzin/L'D'Q'
Ararat/L'
Arcturus/L'D'Q'
Arduino/L'D'Q'
Aristote/L'D'Q'
Arkham/L'D'Q'
Armando/L'D'Q'
Arsène/L'D'Q'
Arturo/L'D'Q'
Assouan/L'D'Q'
Asus/L'D'Q'
Atatürk/L'D'Q'
Aubrey/L'D'Q'
Auchan/L'D'Q'
Audran/L'D'Q'
Austerlitz/L'D'Q'
Australasie/L'D'Q'
Auvergne/L'D'
Azathoth/L'D'Q'
ECS/L'D'Q'
Échirolles/L'D'Q'
Eddy/L'D'Q'
Edegem/L'D'Q'
Ehrenpreis/L'D'Q'
Eisenhower/L'D'Q'
Ekaterinbourg/L'D'Q'
Eliott/L'D'Q'
Elme/L'D'Q'
Éloi/L'D'Q'
Emmanuel/L'D'Q'
Enghien-les-Bains/L'D'Q'
Enguerrand/L'D'Q'
Équateur/L'D'
Ergodis/L'D'Q'
Erik/L'D'Q'
Eschyle/L'D'Q'
Essen/L'D'Q'
Étaples/L'D'Q'
Etherpad/L'D'Q'
Eva/L'D'Q'
Éva/L'D'Q'
Evgeny/L'D'Q'
Haacht/L'D'Q'
Habacuc/L'D'Q'
Harlem/L'D'Q'
Harold/L'D'Q'
Haydée/L'D'Q'
Hélios/L'D'Q'
Helsinki/L'D'Q'
Hermine/L'D'Q'
Hérouville-Saint-Clair/L'D'Q'
Hilde/L'D'Q'
Hocine/L'D'Q'
Honolulu/L'D'Q'
Hyderabad/L'D'Q'
IETF/L'D'Q'
IMSI/L'D'Q'
ISO/L'D'Q'
Ichtegem/L'D'Q'
Ille-et-Vilaine/L'D'
Inkscape/L'D'Q'
Intermarché/L'D'Q'
Islamabad/L'D'Q'
Islande/L'D'
Ivry-sur-Seine/L'D'Q'
Izmir/L'D'Q'
Octeville/L'D'Q'
Offenbach/L'D'Q'
Olonne-sur-Mer/L'D'Q'
Olympie/L'D'Q'
Orion/L'D'Q'
Osric/L'D'Q'
Ottignies-Louvain-la-Neuve/L'D'Q'
Otto/L'D'Q'
UMTS/L'D'
Uruguay/L'D'
Uster/L'D'Q'
à/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
abat-foin/L'D'Q'
accidentellement/D'Q'
accroche-cœur/L'D'Q'
adénovirus/L'D'Q'
afin/Q'Q*
agréablement/D'Q'
agressivement/D'Q'
ais/L'D'Q'
alors/D'Q'Qj
alpha/L'D'Q'
alternativement/D'Q'
amour-propre/L'D'Q'
anis/L'D'Q'
annuellement/D'Q'
antibois/L'D'Q'
antimigraineux/L'D'Q'
antipolio/L'D'Q'
antirides/L'D'Q'
antivaccin/S=
appuie-nuque/L'D'Q'
après/L'D'Q'Qj
arc-doubleau/L'D'Q'
architecturalement/D'Q'
assez/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
assidument/D'Q'
asti/L'D'Q'
au/L'D'Q'QjQ*
auburn/L'D'Q'
aujourd'hui/D'Q'Qj
auprès/D'Q'Qj
autos-couchettes/L'D'Q'
autrefois/D'Q'
aux/Q'QjQ*
baggy/A.()
barbeau/X.()
barman/A.()
basmati/S.()
bateau/X.()
berceau/X.()
bigotisme/S.()
bihoreau/X.()
biseau/X.()
bocal/X.()
body/A.()
bolétique/S.()
bordereau/X.()
boss/A.()
bouche-à-oreille/S=
boutefeu/X.()
brandy/A.()
bravo/I.()
brévétoxine/S.()
brunch/A.()
buggy/A.()
bull-finch/A.()
bureau/X.()
bush/A.()
bushman/A.()
businessman/A.()
businesswoman/A.()
cadogan/S.()
caïeu/X.()
cameraman/A.()
canal/X.()
canzone/I.()
caractère/S.()
carbonaro/I.()
car-ferry/A.()
carneau/X.()
caveau/X.()
céladon/S.()
cent/S=
céteau/X.()
chapeau/X.()
chaudrée/S.()
chauffe-eau/X.()
cherry/A.()
cheval/X.()
chrémeau/X.()
chuintante/S.()
clash/A.()
claveau/X.()
coach/A.()
coagulum/I.()
coccus/I.()
cochonceté/S.()
columbarium/I.()
comptable/S.()
condottiere/I.()
conoyau/X.()
contre-fugue/S.()
cordeau/X.()
cotation/S.()
coupe-feu/X.()
crash/A.()
criterium/I.()
croupissement/S.()
cuisseau/X.()
curriculum/I.()
cyclo-cross/A.()
daphnie/S.()
déformable/S.()
dépositoire/S.()
desideratum/I.()
dévorement/S.()
dieu/X.()
dinghy/A.()
dissection/S.()
duplicateur/S.()
efficacement/D'Q'
effrontément/D'Q'
elle/D'Q'Q*
elles/D'Q'Q*
en/Q'Q*Qjd'
en/Q'Q*Qjn'd'j'l'm't's'c'
endos/L'D'Q'
en-soi/L'D'Q'
entrailles/D'Q'
entre/D'Q'Qj
esprit-de-vin/L'D'
essuie-tout/L'D'Q'
exequatur/L'D'Q'
expertement/D'Q'
express/L'D'Q'
faisanneau/X.()
feld-maréchal/X.()
ferment/S.()
flash/A.()
fluidique/S.()
flûteau/X.()
fontanili/S=
foramen/I.()
friponneau/X.()
fritillaire/S.()
ftp/S=
gagman/A.()
gattilier/S.()
genou/X.()
gentleman/A.()
globuline/S.()
gouttereau/X.()
gréement/S.()
grizzly/A.()
gruppetto/I.()
hachereau/X.()
hennin/S.()
hiatus/L'D'Q'
hobby/A.()
holomorphiquement/D'Q'
hors-jeu/X.()
http/S=
ici/D'Q'Qj
ictus/L'D'Q'
idéalement/D'Q'
ides/D'Q'
il/D'Q'Q*QjSi
ils/D'Q'Q*Si
imperturbablement/D'Q'
import-export/L'D'Q'
indélicatement/D'Q'
indifféremment/D'Q'
ingénieur-conseil/L'D'Q'
inhabituellement/D'Q'
intensivement/D'Q'
interminablement/D'Q'
isatis/L'D'Q'
isentropiquement/L'D'Q'
itérativement/D'Q'
jazzman/A.()
joujou/X.()
juke-box/A.()
jusqu'au-boutisme/S.()
lady/A.()
lande/S.()
latifundium/I.()
lazzarone/I.()
levreau/X.()
libretto/I.()
limite/S=
limonade/S.()
lobby/A.()
louveteau/X.()
lunch/A.()
luth/S.()
maffioso/I.()
mafioso/I.()
mammographie/S.()
marsupial/X.()
match/A.()
math/S=
mayen/S.()
medium/I.()
memorandum/I.()
métacentrique/S.()
métal/X.()
milady/A.()
mini/S.()
monozygote/S.()
monsignore/I.()
morceau/X.()
muséologue/S.()
néo-mercantilisme/S.()
niveau/X.()
nostalgie/S.()
nuraghe/I.()
nursery/A.()
oiseaux-mouches/D'Q'
ollas-podridas/D'Q'
on/L'D'Q'Q*
orémus/L'D'Q'
originairement/D'Q'
où/D'Q'Qj
pagus/I.()
palazzo/I.()
panonceau/X.()
pantouflage/S.()
panty/A.()
paparazzo/I.()
partita/I.()
patience/S.()
pecorino/I.()
penny/A.()
périodisation/S.()
phénocristal/X.()
photo/S.()
phylum/I.()
pianissimo/I.()
pifferaro/I.()
pique-feu/X.()
pisse-vinaigre/S.()
pitch/A.()
pizzaiolo/I.()
pizzicato/I.()
poireau/X.()
pôle/S.()
porte-drapeau/X.()
post-traumatique/S.()
prélinteau/X.()
prima-donna/I.()
proxy/A.()
pseudoéphédrine/S.()
pupazzo/I.()
putto/I.()
quantum/I.()
quatre-vingt/S=
quintal/X.()
ramponneau/X.()
randonnée/S.()
rash/A.()
recordman/A.()
relish/A.()
reprographique/S.()
ricercare/I.()
rinceau/X.()
royalty/A.()
rush/A.()
sacoche/S.()
sanatorium/I.()
sanctoral/X.()
scenario/I.()
scotch/A.()
scriptorium/I.()
scutum/I.()
self-made-man/A.()
sénéchal/X.()
sentier/S.()
sherry/A.()
slash/A.()
solo/I.()
soprano/I.()
souriceau/X.()
sous-espèce/S.()
speakeasy/A.()
sportsman/A.()
stimulus/I.()
sulky/A.()
superdécrochage/S.()
superwoman/A.()
symposium/I.()
taureau/X.()
taxum/I.()
tégumentaire/S.()
tempo/I.()
tennisman/A.()
toccata/I.()
tombereau/X.()
tommy/A.()
toquante/S.()
travail/X.()
triclinium/I.()
trullo/I.()
tuffeau/X.()
tumulus/I.()
tungstique/S.()
t'elle/S=
t'il/S=
un/D'Q'Q*
une/D'Q'Q*
ut/L'D'Q'
vau/X.()
vingt/S=
vipereau/X.()
vocératrice/S.()
vocero/I.()
wallaby/A.()
whisky/A.()
y/Q'Q*n'd'j'l'm't's'
yachtman/A.()
yachtswoman/A.()
yeoman/A.()
zingaro/I.()
